Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Chapter 3

Municipal Correctional Houses

41-3-101. Municipal correctional houses authorized.

The authorities of any incorporated town may provide such lands, buildings and articles of any kind as may be necessary for a workhouse or house of correction for that town, may appoint suitable persons for the management of the workhouse or house of correction, and make all necessary bylaws and regulations for the government of the inmates, and cause the bylaws and regulations to be enforced.

Code 1858, § 5410; Shan., § 7390; mod. Code 1932, § 11999; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1401.

Cross-References. Sanitary inspection, § 4-3-1803.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, § 8.

Law Reviews.

Liability of State Officials and Prison Corporations for Excessive Use of Force Against Inmates of Private Prisons, 40 Vand. L. Rev. 983 (1987).

41-3-102. Punishment of prisoners.

Any prisoner refusing to work or becoming disorderly may be confined in solitary confinement and fed on bread and water or subjected to such other punishment, not inconsistent with humanity, as may be deemed necessary by the commissioners for the government and control of the prisoners.

Prisoners refusing to work or while in solitary confinement shall receive no credit for the time so spent.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 17; Shan., § 7422; Code 1932, § 12000; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1402.

Cross-References. Unauthorized means of punishment, § 41-21-404.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

41-3-103. Payment of earnings to prisoner held for safekeeping.

If a prisoner is confined for safekeeping, the prisoner's earnings, after paying for board, shall be paid over to the prisoner on discharge.

Code 1858, § 5414; Shan., § 7394; Code 1932, § 12001; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1403.

41-3-104. Detention for failure to pay fines and costs.

If a prisoner is confined for failure to pay a fine and costs, the prisoner shall be detained until the fine and costs, except litigation tax, have been paid by the proceeds of the prisoner's labor.

Code 1858, § 5415; Shan., § 7395; mod. Code 1932, § 12002; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1404.

Code Commission Notes.

Provisions of this section concerning imprisonment for failure to pay costs may be affected by Anderson v. Ellington, 300 F. Supp. 789 (M.D. Tenn. 1969), which held that imprisonment for nonpayment of costs violates the United States Constitution.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 32.193.

41-3-105. Detention after term of imprisonment.

After the term for which a prisoner is imprisoned has expired, the prisoner shall be detained until the fine and costs are paid, as provided in § 41-3-104.

Code 1858, § 5417; Shan., § 7397; Code 1932, § 12003; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1405.

Code Commission Notes.

Provisions of this section concerning imprisonment for failure to pay costs may be affected by Anderson v. Ellington, 300 F. Supp. 789 (M.D. Tenn. 1969), which held that imprisonment for nonpayment of costs violates the United States Constitution.

41-3-106. Inmate labor for private purposes — Travel restrictions.

No sheriff, jailer or other person responsible for the care and custody of inmates housed in a county or municipal jail or workhouse may employ, require or otherwise use any inmate housed in the jail or workhouse to perform labor that will or may result directly or indirectly in the sheriff's, jailer's or other person's personal gain, profit or benefit or in gain, profit or benefit to a business partially or wholly owned by the sheriff, jailer or other person. This subsection (a) shall apply regardless of whether the inmate is or is not compensated for the labor.

No sheriff, jailer or other person responsible for the care and custody of inmates housed in a county or municipal jail or workhouse may permit any inmate housed in the jail or workhouse to perform any labor for the gain, profit or benefit of a private citizen or a for-profit corporation, partnership or other business unless the labor is part of a court-approved work release program or unless the work release program operates under a commission established pursuant to § 41-2-134.

Inmates housed in a county or municipal jail or workhouse may voluntarily perform any labor on behalf of a charitable organization or a nonprofit corporation or a governmental entity.

No sheriff, jailer or other person responsible for the care and custody of inmates housed in a county or municipal jail or workhouse may permit any inmate housed in the jail or workhouse to leave this state unless the travel is approved by the sentencing court or unless the inmate is in need of emergency medical treatment available only in another state or there is a death or medical emergency in the inmate's immediate family.

Any sheriff, jailer or other person responsible for the custody of an inmate housed in a local facility who violates this section, upon a first conviction therefor, commits a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine equal to the value of the services received from the inmate or inmates and imprisonment for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than eleven (11) months and twenty-nine (29) days. Upon a second or subsequent conviction for a violation of this section, the sheriff, jailer or other person commits a felony and shall be punished by a fine of not less than the value of the services received from the inmate or inmates nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and imprisonment for not less than one (1) nor more than five (5) years. If the person violating this section for the second or subsequent time is a public official, in addition to the punishment set out in this subdivision (d)(1), the person shall immediately forfeit the person's office and shall be forever barred from holding public office in this state.

Any private citizen, corporation, partnership or other business knowingly and willfully using inmate labor in violation of subsection (b) commits a Class A misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) and by imprisonment for not more than eleven (11) months and twenty-nine (29) days. Each day inmate labor is used in violation of subsection (b) constitutes a separate offense.

Acts 1985, ch. 130, § 1; 1989, ch. 48, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 2004, ch. 636, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor and felony in (d)(1) have been designated as Class A and Class E, respectively, by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that offenses designated misdemeanors without specification as to category are Class A and offenses designated felonies without specification are Class E. See also §§ 39-11-113, 39-11-114.

Cross-References. Inmate labor for private purposes, travel restrictions, § 41-2-148.

Jails and jailers, title 41, ch. 4.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

Unlawful use of inmates, Class E felony, § 4-6-139.

Use of inmates for personal gain, § 4-6-138.

Work programs, title 41, ch. 22.

Attorney General Opinions. Inmate labor may benefit private party, OAG 03-075, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 91 (6/18/03).

41-3-107. Public service for municipal offenders — Immunity from liability.

Municipal offenders confined or subject to confinement in a county or municipal jail or workhouse under applicable law may be sentenced by the court to perform public service work for the municipality.

The municipality and its officers and employees shall not be liable for any injury sustained by the offender while the offender is on a public service work detail if the municipality exercised due care in the supervision of the offender.

The municipality and its officers and employees shall not be liable to any person for the acts of any offender while the offender is on a public service work detail if the municipality exercised due care in the supervision of the offender.

The municipality and its officers and employees shall not be liable to any offender or the offender's family for death or injuries received while the offender is on a public service work detail if the municipality exercised due care in the supervision of the offender.

The authority and protection from liability provided by this section are supplemental and in addition to the authority and protection provided in other laws.

Acts 1993, ch. 238, § 1.